District of Columbia statutes.
2-1215.19

Prohibited acts.

No BID corporation shall engage in the financial support of political activities and candidates, lobbying on legislative or administrative actions with respect to any property or area, or the promotion of one business to the exclusion of others. Nothing contained within this subchapter shall be construed as modifying the terms of any lease or occupancy agreement between an owner and commercial tenant.

May 29, 1996, D.C. Law 11-134, § 19, 43 DCR 1684
renumbered as § 20, Oct. 8, 1997, D.C. Law 12-26, § 2, 44 DCR 4320
1981 Ed., § 1-2289.
For temporary (225 day) amendment of section, see § 2 of the Business Improvement Districts Temporary Amendment Act of 1997 (D.C. Law 12-23, September 23, 1997, law notification 44 DCR 5762).
For temporary amendment of section, see § 2 of the Business Improvement Districts Emergency Amendment Act of 1997 (D.C. Act 12-89, June 19, 1997, 44 DCR 3747), and § 2 of the Business Improvement Districts Congressional Review Emergency Amendment Act of 1997 (D.C. Act 12-146, August 12, 1997, 44 DCR 5054).

Expiration of Law 11-134

See Historical and Statutory Notes following § 2-1215.01.